<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881017-0020 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.10-17-88.f2.A1019</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 200 / Monday, October 17, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 51 and 52 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[AD-FRL-3436-1]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Prevention of Significant Deterioration for Nitrogen Oxides </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>EPA is promulgating regulations under section 166 ofthe Clean Air Act (ACT) to prevent significant deterioration of air qualitydue to emission of nitrogen oxides. These regulations establish the maximumincrease in ambient nitrogen dioxide concentrations allowed in an areaabove the baseline concentration; these maximum allowable increases arecalled increments. Increments for nitrogen dioxide were proposed in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>on February 8, 1988 (53 FR 3698). Today's actionpromulgates these increments for nitrogen dioxide. The intended effectof these regulations is to require all applicants for major new stationarysources and major modifications emitting nitrogen oxides to account forand, if necessary, restrict emissions so as not to cause or contributeto exceedances of the increments established today.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>The revision to 40 CFR Part 51 will become effective October17, 1989. The revisions to 40 CFR Part 52 will become effective November19, 1990.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>A docket, number A-87-16, containing information consideredby EPA in the development of the promulgated regulations is available forpublic inspection between 8:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m., weekdays, at EPA's CentralDocket Section (LE-131), WIC Building, South Conference Center, Room 4,401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460. A reasonable fee may be chargedfor copying.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Eric Noble at Mail Drop 15, U.S.Environmental Protection Agency, Research Triangle Park, North Carolina27711, telephone (919) 541-5362 (FTS 629-5362).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2> The contents of today's preamble areprovided in the following outline: <ITAG tagnum="74">I. Summary of the Regulation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">II. Discussion of the Regulations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">A. PSD Increments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">B. Baseline Date </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">C. Implementation Date </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">D. Grandfathering Issues </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">III. Major Issues </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">A. Pollutant Chosen for Increment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">B. Regulatory Alternatives </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">C. Class II Increment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">D. Class I Increment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">E. Mobile Sources </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">F. Model Facilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">G. Air Quality Modeling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">H. Costs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">I. Restrictions on Siting </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">J. Ozone </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">K. Baseline Date </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">L. Emissions Banking </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">M. Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">IV. Administrative </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Summary of the Regulations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s100,r20</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Pollutant to be regulated <D>Nitrogen Dioxide. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Type of regulation <D>Increment. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Area classification scheme <D>Classes I, II, and III. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Increments <D>Class I, 2.5 </D>mg/m 3. <P>Class II, 25 </P>mg/m 3. <P>Class III, 50 </P>mg/m 3.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Averaging time <D>Annual. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Major source baseline date <D>Feb. 8, 1988.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Trigger Date (for minor source baseline date) <D>Feb. 8, 1988. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Effective Date (Part 51) <D>Oct. 17, 1989. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Effective Date (general) (Part 52) <D>Nov. 19, 1990. </D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">II. Discussion of the Regulations </ITAG>On February 8, 1988, the EPA proposed prevention of significant deterioration(PSD) regulations for nitrogen oxides under section 166 of the Act, 42U.S.C. 7476 (see 53 FR 3698). The term nitrogen oxides refers to a familyof compounds of nitrogen and oxygen. The principal nitrogen oxides componentpresent in the atmosphere at any time is nitrogen dioxides. Combustionsources emit mostly nitric oxide, with some nitrogen dioxide. Upon enteringthe atmosphere, the nitric oxide changes rapidly, mostly to nitrogen dioxide.The conversion process continues, albeit much more slowly, producing nitricacid and nitrate salts. The February 8, 1988 notice proposed to revise40 CFR Parts 51 and 52 adding increments for nitrogen dioxide to the existingPSD program. Increments establish the maximum allowable increases in ambientconcentrations of a pollutant allowed in a PSD area, above applicable baselineconcentrations in specified geographic areas, as a result of emissionsfrom both stationary and mobil sources. After receiving and reviewing publiccomments on the proposed increment requirements, EPA is today promulgatingfinal nitrogen dioxide increments. The 40 CFR 51.166 regulations adopted today specify minimum rulemakingrequirements for approvable State implementation plan (SIP) revisions.The 40 CFR 52.21 regulations adopted today specify the revisions that willeventually be applied by delegation (or directly by EPA) to areas whichhave not, within the specified time, submitted SIP revisions to EPA pursuantto today's 40 CFR 51.166 revisions. The regulations adopted today stem in part from a lawsuit filed by theSierra Club and others against the EPA Administrator in 1986 (<T3>Sierra Club v. Thomas,</T3> No. C-86-0971 WWS (N.D. CAL.)). In April1987, the U.S. District Court for the Northern District of California directedthe EPA Administrator to conduct a regulatory development program for nitrogenoxides under a specified schedule. The Court's schedule called for thepublication of proposed regulations for nitrogen oxides by February 9,1988, which was accomplished. The Court further directed the Administratorto promulgate final regulations on later then October 9, 1988 (see 658F. Supp. 165). Today's action satisfies the order of the District Court.A. PSD IncrementsThe PSD increments for nitrogen dioxide were developed pursuant to theprovisions of section 166 of the Act. Specifically, this section requiresthe adoption of PSD regulations for nitrogen oxides (as well as for otherpollutants) to provide ``numerical measures against which permit applicationsmay be evaluated, a framework for stimulating improved control technology,(and) protection of air quality values.'' Further, section 166 requiresthat the regulations include ``specific measures at least as effectiveas'' the existing increments established by Congress in section 163 ofthe Act for particulate matter and sulfur dioxide in meeting the goalsand purposes of the PSD program.The section 166 regulations for nitrogen oxides promulgated today are basedon an ambient increment requirement for nitrogen dioxide as the numericalmeasure of significant deterioration in air quality. Nitrogen dioxide wasselected as the pollutant for this regulation because it is the pollutanton which the national ambient air quality standards (NAAQS) for nitrogenoxides were based. Since the NAAQS are the measure of air quality, theyare also the most appropriate measure of changes in air quality, includingsignificant deterioration. Nitrogen dioxide was also selected as the pollutantbecause nitrogen oxides emissions from stationary sources convert to nitrogendioxide in the atmosphere.The nitrogen dioxide increments follow the pattern enacted by Congressfor the particulate matter and sulfur dioxide increments. These incrementsestablish maximum increases in ambient air concentrations of nitrogen dioxide(expressed in micrograms per cubic meter (andCx.18;g/m3)) allowed in a PSDarea over a baseline concentration. These increments are applicable toboth stationary and mobile sources, and are implemented through a seriesof permit review requirements that are already in place for major new stationarysources or major modifications, as defined in 40 CFR Parts 51 and 52.The nitrogen dioxide increment program also includes the three-tiered areaclassification system established by Congress in section 163 for incrementsof sulfur dioxide and particulate matter. Class I areas (including certainnational parks and wilderness areas) were designated by Congress as areasof special national concern, where the need to prevent significant deteriorationin air quality is the greatest. Consequently, the increment levels aremost stringent in Class I areas. Class II areas are all areas not specificallydesignated in the Act as Class I areas. The increments of Class II areasare less stringent than the Class I increments and allow for a moderatedegree of emissions growth. Class III areas are areas, originally designatedas Class II, that have been redesignated by States where higher levelsof industrial development and emissions growth are desired, and are subjectto the least stringent increment requirement. There are as yet no ClassIII areas.Today's notice establishes nitrogen dioxide increments based on the precentagesCongress used to set the increments for sulfur dioxide and particulatematter. For example, the nitrogen dioxide Class I increment is set at 2.5andCx.18;g/m3, a level of 2.5 percent of the NAAQS. It is based on the ClassI sulfur dioxide increment, which is set at the same percentage (2.5 percent)of the sulfur dioxide NAAQS. Similarly, the Class II increment has beenset at 25 andCx.18;g/m3 and Class III increment has been set at 50 andCx.18;g/m3.The EPA considers these increments to be ``at least as effective as'' theexisting particulate matter and sulfur dioxide increments in preventingsignificant deterioration of air quality.The NAAQS for nitrogen dioxide is expressed in 40 CFR 50.11 in parts permillion and in andCx.18;g/m3 (i.e., 0.053 ppm or 100 andCx.18;g/m3). However,for consistency with the sulfur dioxide and particulate matter increments,andCx.18;g/m3 will be used throughout this preamble. The regulation incorporatingthese increments is also expressed in micrograms per cubic meter. It shouldbe noted that these increments, like those for particulate matter and sulfurdioxide, are absolute limits. This means, for example, that a modeled impactof 25.1 andCx.18;g/m3 for a proposed new source would result in an exceedanceof the Class II increment of 25 andCx.18;g/m3, while a modeled impact of24.9 andCx.18;g/m3 would not. In neither case is the result ``rounded off''to 25 andCx.18;g/m3.The averaging time for the nitrogen dioxide increments is an annual average,based on the averaging period of the NAAQS for nitrogen dioxide. Unlikeparticulate matter and sulfur dioxide, for which there are both short-termNAAQS and short-term increments, there is no short-term nitrogen dioxideNAAQS. Therefore, there is no comparative basis to establish a short-termnitrogen dioxide increment that is equivalent to short-term sulfur dioxideand particulate matter increments. As a result, only an annual time periodhas been used in establishing increments for nitrogen dioxide.In determining what increment levels could be considered ``at least aseffective as'' the particulate matter and sulfur dioxide increments, EPAfirst looked to the example set by Congress in enacting the incrementsfor particulate matter and sulfur dioxide. Then, EPA considered the abilityof these and other alternative increments to stimulate new control technologyand balance industrial growth with environmental concerns. In addition,a relative comparison of the known and potential adverse environmentaleffects of particulate matter and sulfur dioxide (the pollutants for whichnumerical increments have been established) to nitrogen dioxide was undertakenby EPA. Given the paucity of scientific data, a comprehensive, quantitativeprofile of these effects for the nitrogen dioxide versus sulfur dioxideand particulate matter increments could not be developed.The EPA determined that the increments for nitrogen dioxide do providea framework for stimulating improved control technologies. For new or modifiedsources seeking to locate in an area that is approaching the incrementlimit, the increments establish an incentive to apply more stringent controltechnologies in order to avoid violating the increment.The EPA has also determined that the nitrogen dioxide increments adoptedtoday will balance industrial growth with environmental concerns. It isestimated that no industrial source would be prevented from constructingin an area where the full increment is available, with one possible exception(i.e., a major chemical plant in an urban area with adverse meteorologicalconditions). In fact, EPA estimates most urban areas will be able to accommodatea number of nitrogen oxide emission sources. At the same time, the incrementswill provide a degree of protection to the environment by providing a mechanismfor limiting the deterioration in air quality resulting from emissionsof nitrogen oxides in all areas of the country subject to the PSD program.The increments provide greater protection of air quality in Class I areasthan in Class II areas by providing more stringent limits on increasesin ambient concentrations of nitrogen dioxide. Beyond the increment requirements,section 165 of the Act gives the Federal land manager (FLM) in charge ofspecific Class I areas the authority and discretion to require the examinationof the impacts of new sources on the air quality related values (AQRV's)associated with those areas. If these impacts are determined to be adverse,the reviewing authority may deny the application unless additional measuresare taken to protect those AQRV's, even in instances where the incrementis not violated.  The Class I increments established by Congress for particulate matter andsulfur dioxide vary with respect to their relative percentage of the NAAQS.In establishing the Class I increment for nitrogen dioxide, EPA determinedthat nitrogen dioxide more closely resembles sulfur dioxide than particulatematter in its characteristics and sources of emissions, and, therefore,sulfur dioxide was the model followed in setting these increments. As aresult, the nitrogen dioxide increment for Class I areas has been set atthe same percentage of the nitrogen dioxide NAAQS as the sulfur dioxideincrement is of the sulfur dioxide NAAQS.  The EPA has concluded that the increment is the only one of the ten regulatoryalternatives discussed in the 1980 Advanced Notice of Public Rulemaking(45 FR 30099) that currently provides a workable numerical measure andultimately prevented. The EPA believes that the increment approach willbest fulfill the goals of the PSD program, as well as utilize the expertisealready developed by State and local regulatory agencies in implementingincrement-based programs for particulate matter and sulfur dioxide. Thisapproach will require applicants for major new stationary sources and majormodifications to model the area around the proposed source for incrementexceedances. No support has been evidenced at the State level for any measure,other than direct application of the increments, for implementing the section166 regulations for nitrogen oxides. However, since other methods mightbe preferable to some States, EPA remains open to other possible implementationapproaches, provided that such approach (e.g., emissions density zoning)can be demonstrated to be as effective as direct application of the increments,as required by section 166. The EPA does not plan to issue any guidanceon developing such alternatives. Interested States may develop alternativeson their own initiative and submit the proposed approach to EPA for approval. B. Baseline Date  The term ``baseline date,'' as used here and in the preamble to the proposedregulations, is somewhat of a misnomer, as it encompasses three differentdates: (1) The major source baseline date, (2) the minor source baselinedate, and (3) the trigger date for the minor source baseline date. Themajor source baseline date is the date after which construction of anymajor new or modified stationary source of nitrogen oxides emissions ina PSD area consumes increment. The minor source baseline date is the dateafter which emissions from all new or modified sources consume (or expand)increment, including emissions from major and minor sources. Once the baselineconcentration is set, changes in actual emissions at any source consume(or expand) increment, regardless of whether the emissions changes area result of construction. The minor source baseline date is the earliestdate after a so-called ``trigger date'' on which a complete applicationfor a major source or major modification is submitted for approval to areviewing authority.  The date for both the major source baseline date and the trigger date proposedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> was the date of proposal, February 8, 1988. TheEPA has concluded that this date complies with the provisions of the Actwhile avoiding placing unnecessary administrative complexities on Stateagencies and permit applicants.C. Implementation Date There are two important time periods specified by section 166(b) of theAct that will affect the implementation of the increments for nitrogendioxide. First, a 1-year time period is required by section 166(b) betweenthe date of promulgation of these PSD section 166 regulations and the effectivedate of the regulation. Second, section 166(b) of the Act also providesStates up to 9 months following the effective date of promulgation of thenew regulations to prepare the necessary amendments to SIP's, and an additional4 months (13 months total) for EPA to review the proposed SIP revisionsprior to determining their approvability. Consequently, a period of upto 25 months (12 months from promulgation to the effective date plus 13months for SIP approval) could elapse between the promulgation of theseincrements and their implementation. The actual time which elapses between promulgation and implementation dependson two factors: The mechanism by which the PSD program is implemented inan area; and the action a State or area takes to enable it to implementthe program. There are three mechanisms by which the PSD program is implemented.First, State can have its own PSD permitting procedures which have beenapproved by EPA as meeting the requirements of 40 CFR 51.166; this is termeda SIP-approved program. Second, where a State has failed to submit a PSDprogram meeting the requirements of 40 CFR 51.166, EPA can, pursuant to40 CFR 52.21, delegate authority to the State to issue PSD permits in accordancewith the Federal PSD regulations in 40 CFR 52.21; this is termed a delegatedprogram. Finally, in a few areas of the country that have neither submittedan approvable program or sought a delegation, and in Indian lands whereStates lack authority to administer PSD requirements, EPA Regional Officesissue PSD permits directly, under 40 CFR 52.21. Clearly, for SIP-approved programs, section 166(b) of the Act contemplateda 40 CFR 51.166 rule that would take effect 12 months after promulgationand allow States 9 months after that (21 months after promulgation) tosubmit revised SIP's incorporating the nitrogen dioxide increments. TheEPA was then expected to approve or disapprove the SIP revision within4 months, so the maximum time anticipated for implementation in SIP-approvedareas is 25 months. The EPA will follow this schedule. Each State or areawith a SIP-approved PSD program will have until July 17, 1990, to submitto EPA a SIP revision implementing the nitrogen dioxide increment rule.Revised SIP's may, of course, be submitted earlier, but EPA cannot approveany such revisions until October 17, 1989, the effective date of today's40 CFR 51.166 revision. If a State with a SIP-approved program fails tosubmit SIP revisions which incorporate the nitrogen dioxide increment regulationswithin 21 months, EPA will proceed through rulemaking to create a Federal(but delegable) program for that State which embodies the necessary additionalprovisions as promulgated in 40 CFR 52.21. It is evident from Part C of the Act generally, and the detailed schedulein section 166 of the Act in particular, that Congress anticipated thatvirtually all the PSD programs would be SIP-approved by the time of section166 rulemaking. Such is, however, not the case; 18 States have delegatedPSD programs and EPA still implements the PSD program directly in all orpart of two States, as well as in Indian lands. In proposing this rule, EPA requested comment on the following two implementationdate options for States currently lacking SIP-approved PSD programs andfor Indian lands:(1) October 17, 1989, the same effective date as the 40 CFR 51.166 revisions,or (2) November 19, 1990, the date by which the Act anticipated the programwould be implemented.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Upon further consideration, EPA has concluded that the most appropriateand consistent approach to implementing this regulation is to follow thelanguage of section 166 to the greatest extent possible. Specifically,section 166(b) provides up to 21 months from the date of promulgation ofsection 166 regulations for States to submit SIP revisions to EPA for approval.The EPA believes it appropriate to provide each State an opportunity todevelop a SIP-approved program. Therefore, every State will be provided21 months in which to develop and submit a SIP program for PSD, includingthe regulations required by today's action. This approach should also minimizedifferences in implementation dates between the States due to differencesin PSD program mechanisms. Therefore, this regulation establishes the generaleffective date of today's 40 CFR 52.21 revisions as November 19, 1990.It should be noted, however, that, as events actually unfold over this25-month period, the revisions to 40 CFR 52.21 regulations may come intoeffect in some areas at times other than the generally applicable effectivedate. First, a State might adopt and submit the necessary SIP revisions(perhaps as part of a comprehensive PSD permitting program) and EPA Mightapprove it, all between the 12-month and 25-month points. In that case,the revisions to 40 CFR 52.21 would not go into effect in that State atall. Second, EPA might advance the general effective date in the case wherea State stipulates, in writing, that it does not intend to submit the necessarySIP revisions (thereby rejecting the 21-month SIP development time providedin the Act), and requests that EPA delegate to it (i.e., the State) theadministration of the nitrogen dioxide increments program contained inandSection;52.21. Third, EPA might postpone the generally applicable effectivedate in the case of a State which submitted the necessary nitrogen dioxiderevisions before the 21-month point but had not obtained EPA action onthe submission before that effective date. In such a case, the postponementwould last for the time it takes EPA to act on the submission. Finally,if an Indian tribe requests, in writing, an earlier effective date, EPAwill consider advancing the effective date in accordance with the tribe'swishes. The EPA will make a case-by-case judgment based on all of the circumstancesat the time of the request. In no event, however, would EPA make thoserevisions effective any earlier than the 12-month point.Although implementation of the nitrogen dioxide increment program may notoccur for up to 25 months after promulgation, EPA believes that it is prudentfor States to be aware of the nitrogen dioxide increment consumption thatis occurring during the interim period between the baseline date (February8, 1988) and the implementation date. Determining increment consumptionduring this interim period will minimize the difficulties that would otherwiseoccur in retroactively determining the amount of increment consumptionfollowing actual implementation of the nitrogen dioxide increment regulations.Therefore, EPA urges States to have all permit applications for major newand major modified sources include a nitrogen dioxide increment consumptionanalysis. In the same vein, it would be appropriate for States to use theresult of these analyses: (1) In evaluating BACT recommendations, and (2)to encourage sources which would consume most of, or exceed, an incrementto mitigate their impact before construction.D. Grandfathering IssuesAnticipating that today's amendments to andSection;52.21 will come into effectat some time in at least some areas (i.e., not all States will submit approvableSIP revisions within the specified 21-month period), EPA has clarifiedthe applicability of those amendments to projects that have already receivedpermits or filed applications by the time the amendments do take effect.The EPA has added to andSection;52.21(i) a paragraph that states that theamendments requiring a nitrogen dioxide increment consumption analysiswould not apply to any project that has already filed a complete application,including any project that has already received a permit, before the effectivedate of the amendments. The EPA has added to andSection;51.166(i) a paragraphthat a State-adopted plan may contain a like exemption based on completionof a PSD permit application. A State, of course, may elect to have a morenarrow exemption or no exemption at all.In making a decision on whether to include an exemption in the SIP, Statesshould note that major new and modified sources will consume incrementafter the baseline date. If, when increment consumption is eventually determined,the analysis indicates that exceedances of the increment are occurring,the State must take corrective action. This could possibly affect the levelof control at already-permitted sources. To avoid such situations, Statesmay elect not to include a grandfathering provision in their regulations.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Major Issues</ITAG>The proposed section 166 regulations for nitrogen dioxide increments werepublished in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on February 8, 1988 (53 FR 3698). The preambleto the proposed regulations discussed the availability of the TechnicalSupport Document and other reference documents used in the developmentof these regulations. These documents describe in detail the regulatoryalternatives considered and the impacts of those alternatives. Public commentswere solicited at the time of proposal, and copies of the preamble andthe Technical Support Document were distributed to interested parties.To provide interested persons the opportunity for oral presentation concerningthe proposed increment regulations, a public hearing was held on March23, 1988 at Research Triangle Park, North Carolina. The hearing was opento the public and each attendee was given an opportunity to comment onthe proposed regulations.The public comment period was from February 8, 1988 to April 22, 1988.Not counting requests for time extension and duplicate entries, fifty commentletters were received from industry; Federal, State, and local agencies;trade and regulatory associations and environmental groups. Most of thecomment letters contained multiple comments. Each of the major issues raisedby commenters is discussed below, along with EPA's consideration of thecomments. Related comments made by different commenters are grouped togetherand responded to in summary form below. A more detailed response to thecomments received is avilable in the docket. The major issues are:(A) Pollutant chosen for increment; (B) Regulatory alternatives; (C) Class II increment; (D) Class I increment; (E) Mobile sources; (F) Model facilities; (G) Air quality modeling; (H) Costs; (I) Restrictions on siting; (J) Ozone; (K) Baseline date; (L) Emissions banking; and (M) Administration.A. Pollutant Chosen for IncrementTwo commenters stated that the PSD regulations for nitrogen oxides shouldnot be limited in scope to ambient levels of nitrogen dioxide. These commentersstated that, by focusing on nitrogen dioxide, EPA has essentially excludedany mechanism or effective tool for assessing the impacts that will resultfrom the conversion of nitrogen dioxide to a nitrate salt or nitric acid.Further, the commenters pointed out that EPA's focus on nitrogen dioxideis neither justified nor appropriate because section 166 of the Act speaksof nitrogen oxides. Finally, the commenters asserted that EPA has not justifiedthe selection of nitrogen dioxide with reference to the specific goalsand purposes of the PSD program, and that the protection of AQRV's (particularlyagainst acid deposition and visibility impairment) requires the considerationand analysis of the impacts of all nitrogen oxides, not just nitrogen dioxide.The term AQRV refers to items of importance to a Class I area which canbe affected by air pollutants. Visibility, water acidity, and specificplants and animals are typical subjects of AQRV analysis. The FLM is responsiblefor determining AQRV's for each Class I area.The EPA's selection of nitrogen dioxide as the pollutant targeted by thisregulation is consistent with congressional action in establishing sulfurdioxide as the increment for all sulfur compounds. Further, qualitativeanalyses of the impacts of nitrates (and other nitrogen-containing compounds)in AQRV's are currently required under section 165(d)(2) as part of theconsideration of PSD permit applications affecting, or potentially affecting,Class I areas (40 CFR 51.166(p) and 40 CFR 52.21(p)). The impacts on nitratescan therefore be addressed (albeit in a more qualitative manner): (1) Throughthe use of section 165 of the Act, which gives FLM's authority to reviewand comment on permit applications that would adversely affect AQRV's inClass I areas (40 CFR 51.166(p) and 40 CFR 52.21(p)), and (2) in ClassII area by soil and vegetation analyses (40 CFR 51.166(o) and 52.21(o)).One commenter stated that the nitrogen oxides PSD regulations should includea short-term increment, since the short-term effects addressed by the incrementare not necessarily the same as those addressed by the annual NAAQS fornitrogen dioxide. This commenter stated that EPA should conduct a comparisonof the effects of the nitrogen dioxide increment with the short-term sulfurdioxide increment in order to determine equal effectiveness.As EPA stated in the preamble to the proposed regulation, there is no comparablebasis on which to base a short-term increment for nitrogen dioxide. Theuse of the annual NAAQS as the basis of the increment is consistent withthe approach taken by Congress with sulfur dioxide and particulate matter.Because there currently is no short-term NAAQS for nitrogen dioxide (whichwould define short-term air quality), there is currently no comparablebasis for a short-term nitrogen dioxide increment.B. Regulatory AlternativesSeveral commenters stated that a PSD regulation for nitrogen oxides isunnecessary or should be based on the use of BACT, rather than on an incrementapproach, because of the current PSD requirement for stringent BACT. WhileEPA agrees that BACT requirements currently in place for nitrogen oxidescertainly affect the amount of emissions at a proposed site, BACT cannotprevent a significant increase in ambient levels of nitrogen dioxide inareas where multiple facilities locate near one another. Further, section166(c) requires the PSD program for nitrogen oxides to ``provide * * *a framework for stimulating improved control technology.'' Under the incrementprogram, as new sites are permitted they consume available increment. Asthe available increment is consumed, industry may be compelled to findmore effective control measures than previously existing BACT in orderto expand existing operations or to build new facilities, thereby stimulatingimproved control technology.The EPA has reviewed other regulatory alternatives, as discussed in thepreamble to the proposed rulemaking. The EPA determined, however, thatuse of BACT alone does not satisfy the requirements of the Act. While BACTis an important regulatory tool in limiting the emissions from single sources,it must (in the long term, and in consideration of the potential impactsof multiple sources) be coupled with an increment or some other regulatorymechanism is areas where emissions are increasing in order to prevent significantdeterioration in air quality. A few commenters suggested that increments should be established on aregional basis, rather than nationwide. There are at least two difficultieswith regional increments that led EPA to reject this alternative. First,such increment would be difficult to develop and implement. Appropriateincrement levels would have to be developed individually for each regionbased on air quality values, economic growth rates, and other characteristicsof the region. Determining the boundaries of each region would also bedifficult. Second, there is neither precedent nor clear authority in the Act for developingregional increments. Both the provisions of the Act and the history ofthe development and implementation of the PSD program by Congress and EPAsupport the conclusion that the increments are intended to be nationwidein scope, rather than regional. C. Class II Increment Nearly all facilities affected by today's regulation would be located inClass II areas. Some of these facilities may be located relatively closeto a Class I area, but all will have to comply with at least the ClassII increment. The level of the Class II increment drew numerous comments.Several commenters stated that the inclusion of mobile source emissionsin the PSD analysis is inappropriate and could, in effect, make the nitrogendioxide increment more stringent than the particulate matter and sulfurdioxide increments. The EPA does not agree with these comments for two reasons. First, therequirement that the effect of mobile source emissions on increment consumptionto be examined is not applicable only to this nitrogen dioxide increment.Emissions from mobile sources, however, account for a much greater proportionof the ambient concentration of nitrogen dioxide than for either sulfurdioxide or particulate matter, so it is understandable that the provisionmay seem new. Nevertheless, this requirement is in the current PSD regulationsfor sulfur dioxide and particulate matter (see 40 CFR 52.21(o) for provisionsrelating to area source analyses), and no acceptable rationale for alteringthe rule was provided. Second, EPA's analysis indicates that, under some circumstances (e.g.,urban areas), the decreasing contribution of mobile sources to nitrogendioxide concentrations will actually improve nitrogen dioxide air quality(albeit temporarily) as controls on nitrogen oxides emissions from mobilesources result in reductions in mobile source emissions. This decreasein mobile source emissions should effectively expand the nitrogen dioxideincrement available for other sources. As a consequence, for at least anestimated 5 to 10 years, the inclusion of mobile sources in the incrementanalysis for nitrogen dioxide should not make this regulation more stringentor the siting of industrial facilities more difficult, overall, than theexisting increments for particulate matter and sulfur dioxide. Several commenters, while stating that the nitrogen dioxide increment ismore stringent than the particulate matter and sulfur dioxide increments,pointed out that congressional acid rain proposals call for nitrogen dioxidereductions that are one-half to one-third the reductions required for sulfurdioxide. This, they felt, suggests that Congress recognizes that sulfurdioxide has a greater environmental impact than nitrogen dioxide. Consequently,they argue that the nitrogen dioxide increment could be set at a leveltwo to three times greater than the sulfur dioxide increments, measuredas a percent of the NAAQS.The EPA disagrees for a number of reasons. First, the acid rain legislationis in the proposal stage at this time. It would not be prudent, or permissible,for an agency to rely on proposed legislation in promulgating regulations.Second, even if the proposals are enacted, they are designed to addressair quality and programmatic goals that are different from those addressedby the PSD increment program. The acid rain bills are designed to placelimits on the emissions of pollutants that result in a specific environmentalproblem. Consequently, they may differentiate between pollutants basedon various factors (e.g., control technology costs). The PSD program wasdeveloped with a different goal. It is intended to protect public healthand welfare against actual or potential adverse effects notwithstandingcompliance with the NAAQS; protect and enhance air quality in nationalparks and other areas of special concern; insure that economic growth willoccur in a manner consistent with the preservation of existing clean airresources; assure that emissions from one State will not interfere withthe PSD plan of another State; and assure that decisions to increase airpollution are made only after careful evaluation of the consequences andpublic participation in the decisionmaking process (see section 160 ofthe Act). Consequently, the fact that Congress may be considering dissimilarcontrol rates for sulfur rates for sulfur dioxide and nitrogen dioxideemissions for acid rain reduction does not imply that the same ratio shouldbe adopted for PSD purposes.Numerous commenters stated that the increments for nitrogen dioxide shouldbe based on an evaluation of the environmental effects of nitrogen dioxidecompared to those effects caused by particulate matter and sulfur dioxide.As indicated above, EPA believes that in adopting section 166, Congresswas primarily concerned with preventing significant increases in ambientpollutant concentrations. Nevertheless, in its determination of ``at leastas effective as,'' EPA considered a variety of factors. These includedthe potential for the stimulation of new control technology, the possibilityof adverse economic impacts on sources, and the potential or possible adverseeffects of the pollutant in question.When looking at the potential adverse effects of nitrogen dioxide versussulfur dioxide and particulate matter, EPA undertook two analyses: (1)A comparative assessment of the potential for formation of acid compoundsand particulate matter from nitrogen dioxide and sulfur dioxide, and (2)an analysis (which is discussed later in this document) of the potentialfor the nitrogen dioxide increments to limit an area's ability to attainthe ozone NAAQS in areas where higher nitrogen oxides emissions might reduceozone concentrations.The comparative analysis was performed by EPA to determine the relativeamounts of acidic compounds and particulate matter that could theoreticallybe generated from comparable concentrations of nitrogen dioxide and sulfurdioxide in the ambient air. It was concluded that, on an air quality basis,the conversion of roughly equivalent fractions of the ambient standardsfor nitrogen dioxide and sulfur dioxide to acid would produce comparableamounts of acid. The analysis also showed that comparable amounts of particulatematter would be generated if equivalent fractions of the standards wereconverted to salts. Thus, when compared to sulfur dioxide on the basisof the formation of either acids or salts (nitrate or sulfate), the nitrogendioxide Class II increment of 25 andCx.18;g/m\3\ was found to be comparableto the sulfur dioxide Class II increment of 20 andCx.18;g/m\3\. These analyseshave been included in the public docket for this rulemaking. This analysis did not attempt to assess factors such as pollutant fate,transport, or transformation. Rather, it assumed in each case that allthe sulfur dioxide or nitrogen dioxide present would be converted to acidor salts. (Other pollutants such as sulfuric acid, nitric acid, and peroxacetylnitrate (PAN) can form from the emitted nitrogen oxides and sulfur dioxideand can coexist in the atmosphere with nitrogen dioxide and sulfur dioxide.)In addition, the analysis was not able to consider possible benefits (e.g.,some of the acidic transformation products of nitrogen dioxide may be beneficialto the environment, at lower deposition rates, by stimulating terrestrialplant growth). Given that the uncertainty ranges associated with benefitsanalysis are too broad to permit their use as a tool to distinguish betweencomparatively narrow differences in options, EPA determined that it couldnot comprehensively compare the different effects due to sulfur dioxideand nitrogen dioxide to determine nitrogen dioxide increments ``at leastas effective as'' those for sulfur dioxide. In the absence of sufficient information as to the relative adverse effectsof sulfur dioxide versus nitrogen dioxide, and with the only availablecomparative results indicating relative equivalence of the sulfur dioxideand nitrogen dioxide increments, EPA believes that it is reasonable tobase its evaluation of significant deterioration on the percentages ofthe NAAQS, as Congress did for sulfur dioxide and particulate matter. One commenter recommended that, where sources of nitrogen oxides outnumberthose of sulfur dioxide, the proposed increment should be expanded to allowfor continued economic expansion. On the other hand, another commentersuggested that increments for Class II areas should not be set at levelsthat specifically provide for industrial expansion, but that industrialexpansion should be addressed through the use of Class III area designations.The Class II nitrogen dioxide increments adopted by EPA followed the approachestablished by Congress in setting the Class II sulfur dioxide incrementlevel to allow for continued expansion of emissions from sources, but withinacceptable limits. Analyses were conducted by EPA to determine the projectedimpacts on industrial growth that would result from the promulgation ofvarious increments. Based on these analyses, EPA has concluded that theimpact on industrial growth will not be significant for a 25 andCx.18;g/m\3\increment. As noted, in instances where States wish to allow higher levelsof growth in industry and emissions than permitted under the Class II increments,the PSD program provides procedures for States to designate Class III areasthat would have less stringent increment requirements. Other commenters suggested that setting the increment at 25 percent ofthe annual NAAQS for nitrogen dioxide is ``unfounded, arbitrary, and simplistic;''that the percentages used to establish the increment should be based onthe secondary NAAQS for particulate matter, rather than the primary NAAQS;and that the increment should be set at a level equal to the NAAQS.Section 166 of the Act requires the nitrogen oxides regulations to be ``atleast as effective as'' the sulfur dioxide and particulate matter incrementsenacted by Congress. As previously discussed, the EPA believes that basingthe increments for nitrogen dioxide on the same percentage of the NAAQSas was used for the statutory increments is a reasonable approach to complyingwith this requirement, because it uses the same method Congress used. WhenCongress established the increments for particulate matter and sulfur dioxide,it generally calculated them as a percentage of the lower of the primaryor secondary NAAQS for each averaging time. In the specific case that onecommenter has raised, the annual average particulate matter incrementswere set by Congress at levels that were 8.3, 31.3, and 61.7 percent ofthe then annual average secondary NAAQS, which was based on total suspendedparticulate (TSP). However, as noted in those standards, the annual averagesecondary NAAQS was ``a guide to be used in assessing implementation plansto achieve the 24-hour standard.'' Since the annual average particulatematter increments were established at levels that were 6.7, 25.3, and 49.3percent of the then annual average primary NAAQS, it is reasonable to assumethat Congress simply ignored the secondary guide.The EPA, in turn, followed that approach for the nitrogen dioxide increments.Since the primary and secondary nitrogen dioxide NAAQS are the same, ineffect the Class II nitrogen dioxide increment is based on 25 percent ofeither the primary or secondary nitrogen dioxide NAAQS. The EPA does notagree with the suggestion that the increment be set at a level equal tothe NAAQS, since that would not provide clean air areas of the countrywith any of the protection against significant deterioration of air qualitythat is the stated purpose of the PSD provisions set forth in section 166of the Act.D. Class I IncrementThe level of the Class I increment will, of course, affect any source thatmay locate within the boundaries of the Class I area but, more commonly,will affect those sources located in Class II areas which impact ambientnitrogen dioxide levels in a nearby Class I area. The stringency of theClass I increment caused concern primarily to commenters representing industry.Two commenters stated that the Class I increment did not necessarily haveto be set at 2.5 percent of the NAAQS for nitrogen dioxide, since Congressbased the particulate matter and sulfur dioxide increments for Class Iareas on different percentages of the NAAQS for those pollutants. Thesecommenters suggested that EPA consider the impacts of nitrogen oxides onvisibility or vegetation in selecting the size of the Class I increment.Other commenters suggested a higher percentage of the nitrogen dioxideNAAQS for the Class I nitrogen dioxide increment than Congress used foreither particulate matter or sulfur dioxide. They believed less stringentincrements could be justified because of differences they perceived inthe environmental impacts of nitrogen dioxide compared to particulate matterand sulfur dioxide. One commenter recommended a more localized Class Iincrement, based on the unique AQRV's of the specific Class I area.The EPA has concluded that the proposed Class I increments are consistentwith the requirements of the Act and with previous congressional actionin setting increments. In the PSD program, AQRV's are those environmental,social, aesthetic, and economic characteristics of Class I areas that aredependent upon existing ambient pollutant concentrations. Inasmuch as thePSD program is designed to define and to prevent significant deteriorationin air quality on a nationwide basis, the increments themselves do notaddress the variability in local AQRV's associated with specific ClassI areas. Flexibility to address specific AQRV concerns or to grant waiverswhen AQRV's would not be threatened is provided to the FLM's and EPA duringthe process of permit review by section 165 of the Act (40 CFR 51.166(p)and 40 CFR 52.21(p)). Congress set low Class I increments for particulatematter and sulfur dioxide, and provided a mechanism in section 165 of theAct for the denial of a PSD permit where these AQRV's are adversely impacted,even when the Class I increment would not be violated. Today's action establishesa similarly stringent Class I increment for nitrogen dioxide using thesulfur dioxide increment established by Congress as a model. Sulfur dioxide,rather than particulate matter, was chosen as a model because, as notedearlier, nitrogen dioxide sources (primarily combustion sources) and emissionscharacteristics more closely resemble those of sulfur dioxide.One commenter warned that the proposed Class I increment would constrainthe future development of oil and gas reserves, affecting prices and supply.This commenter was also concerned with the impact analysis developed byEPA, thinking that enhanced oil recovery projects will be more prevalentin the future than assumed in the EPA analysis. These projects (e.g., oilshales, tar sands, steam floods for heavy crudes), which will use fuel-burningequipment, are large sources of nitrogen oxides emissions. The most likelysites for these projects are in the Rocky Mountain Region and California,possibly close to Class I areas.The EPA's analysis of existing sources located near Class I areas indicatesthat none of these sources would have been seriously constrained by thenitrogen dioxide increment. In large part, this is because relatively fewnitrogen oxides sources have located near Class I areas and there has beenlittle overlap in the impact areas of different sources. Assuming theseconditions continue, future siting of energy-related sources, or any othersources, can generally be contrained only if the entire increment is consumedby an individual source. Even then, the FLM, if so convinced, can certifythat a source in the vicinity of a Class I area will have no adverse impacton AQRV's, allowing the permit to be issued. The analysis mentioned abovealso indicates that exceedances of the short-term sulfur dioxide incrementsare more likely to be constraining for these source categories than thenitrogen dioxide increment being promulgated today.E. Mobile SourcesOne commenter stated that mobile source emissions should not be includedin the increment analysis because such emissions are not significant contributorsto ambient nitrogen dioxide concentrations. The EPA has concluded that,although individual mobile sources may not be significant sources of nitrogenoxides emissions, in the aggregate they are very significant sources, particularlyin urban areas. It is estimated that mobile sources produce, nationwide,almost half of all nitrogen oxides emissions. Consequently, the regulationspromulgated today continue to require the inclusion of mobile sources inincrement analyses.The rationale for the inclusion of mobile source emissions in incrementanalyses is that the Act indicates Congress was concerned that incrementconsumption reflect actual ambient concentrations. The declaration of purposein section 160 of the Act addresses the potential for increased air pollutionwithout distinguishing between mobile and stationary sources. Althoughthe operative provisions of Part C undoubtedly are geared toward stationarysources, the statute does not suggest that either States or EPA can ignoreair quality deterioration caused by mobile sources. This argues stronglythat EPA should continue to include mobile sources (as well as other minorand area sources) as increment-consuming sources of emissions.A number of commenters stated that mobile sources should be excluded fromthe nitrogen dioxide increment analysis because: (1) Of the difficultyin (a) assessing the effectiveness of mobile source nitrogen oxides emissioncontrols, (b) determining mobile source emissions over an area, and (c)determining the amount of increment consumed or expanded by mobile sourceemissions; (2) mobile sources have not been included in these analysesin the past for particulate matter and sulfur dioxide; (3) it is generally``impossible'' to determine mobile source emissions growth for allowableemissions because of variables of highway design capacities, residentialgrowth, or small business growth, especially considering local variationin weather conditions; and (4) the inclusion of mobile sources in modelingwill reduce the accuracy of the model and increase analysis costs so thatthey will exceed the benefits derived from the inclusion of mobile sources.In contrast to the commenters' concerns, EPA believes it is appropriateto include mobile sources in the increment program and that mobile sourceemissions will not unduly complicate the nitrogen dioxide increment program.This rule is not the first regulatory action that requires determiningthe emissions from mobile sources over an area. For instance, estimatesof mobile source emissions are also made for SIP demonstrations of reasonablefurther progress and attainment, and for other regulatory programs. Thesetechniques are well-documented, and have not posed undue burdens on theimplementation of these regulatory programs. Therefore, it is not anticipatedthat their use in the PSD program for nitrogen dioxide increments willbe unreasonably complex. In order to clarify the application of these proceduresto the increment analysis for nitrogen dioxide, however, EPA will developadditional guidance in the use of these emissions estimating proceduresfor PSD applications.The EPA does not feel that the inclusion of mobile sources in the analysisof nitrogen dioxide increment consumption should place too great a burdenon PSD applicants. Currently, applicants obtain data on stationary sourceemissions from States and use this data to model increment consumption.Similarly, data on vehicle miles traveled in the vicinity of a proposednew or modified major source could be obtained from the State and usedto model increment consumption (or expansion) by mobile sources. If a Statehas no data available on traffic patterns in the vicinity of the source,but has other data available or believes mobile source data from otherstudies or reports to be more accurate than State data, the use of suchalternative data may be approvable on a case-by-case basis. Further, ifa new PSD permit applicant is proposing to locate in close proximity toa previous PSD permittee, the new application may incorporate the previousapplicant's mobile source analysis if the previous application is lessthan one year old (or the data have been updated by the new applicant),covers the same general impact area, and no new mobile source data havebecome available.A number of commenters said it is inappropriate to make regulations specifyingthe use of the <T3>Mobile 4</T3> emission model when that model has not been made available.In response to this comment, EPA has changed this requirement to statethat preliminary analyses should be made with the latest version of the<T3>Mobile </T3>model. Revisions to the <T3>Mobile </T3>model are announced in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>Commenters claimed that including mobile source emissions in incrementanalyses will constrain the siting of stationary sources. Based on theresults of an analysis conducted by EPA, a reduction in emissions frommobile sources will likely occur in many urban areas until the mid-1990's,resulting in an expansion of the increment in those areas. For this reason,the inclusion of mobile source emissions in the increment analysis fornitrogen dioxide should not constrain industrial stationary source growthduring that time period.Commenters also stated that EPA's conclusion that projected reductionsin mobile source emissions will result in expansion of the increment iserroneous and commented that, in high growth areas, mobile sources mayconsume increment even though individual auto emissions may be decreasing.One commenter cited Texas Air Control Board (TACB) analyses that show thatnitrogen dioxide levels in urban areas have stayed the same throughoutthe 1980's, rather than decreasing with reductions in vehicle emissions.The EPA has reviewed the previously mentioned TACB ambient monitoring datastudy. The TACB results do not necessarily mean that ambient nitrogen dioxidelevels from mobile source emissions are not decreasing. One possible conclusionfrom that study would be that increases in nitrogen oxides emissions fromstationary sources are compensating for the decreasing mobile source emissions,in at least some urban areas, keeping ambient concentrations of nitrogendioxide level.Another commenter stated that EPA should do an impact analysis to evaluatethe impact of mobile source growth in urban Class II areas on adjacentClass I areas. The contributions of nitrogen oxides emissions from mobilesources to ambient nitrogen dioxide concentrations were analyzed by EPAfor a high growth urban area during the development of the proposed regulations.This analysis indicated that mobile source contributions to ambient nitrogendioxide concentrations have been decreasing in urban areas and should continueto decrease until the mid-1990's. With a baseline date set at February8, 1988, this means that mobile source emission controls in urban ClassII areas adjacent to Class I areas will, in most cases, result in an expansionof increment in Class I areas as well as in Class II areas. Should mobilesource emissions increase again after 1995, no adverse impact on ClassI areas would be experienced unless the entire reduction in emissions afterthe baseline date is offset by new emissions.One commenter stated that EPA should address the maintenance of ambientnitrogen dioxide levels in urban areas affected by mobile sources after1994. This commenter pointed out that the expansion of the increment createdby improved mobile source emission controls can be considered temporary,so EPA should rethink whether this reduction should be considered an incrementexpansion that is ``available'' for industrial expansion, or whether thistemporary expansion of the increment should be ignored.The EPA retains its rationale from the proposal that there may be severalcircumstances in which an area might experience a temporary expansion ofthe available increment. Those include production decreases resulting fromeconomic conditions as well as improved emission control technologies,as is the case with mobile sources. In each of these instances, however,States must make decisions regarding the management of their air qualityresources and the allocation of the increment. In this sense, the incrementexpansion from reductions in mobile source emissions is not different fromother issues regarding the management of available increment. With theseregulations, EPA does not propose to place constraints on how States chooseto manage the increment. If, however, stationary sources are allowed bythe State to consume the expanded portion of the increment and mobile sourceemissions do increase at some future date, the State will be required tomake the adjustments necessary (e.g., controls on existing sources) tomaintain future compliance with the increments.F. Model FacilitiesIn the development of this regulation, hypothetical facilities were modeledto analyze the cost effectiveness of various controls and to project theemissions levels that could be anticipated from implementation of thosecontrols.Comments were received on the various analyses that EPA conducted to developthe proposed regulations. These comments compare hypothetical plants toactual plants and identify potential inconsistencies between them. In someinstances, EPA has reevaluated its selection of model facilities, or performedadditional analyses in response to the comments received.Several commenters stated that the size of the model utility power plantchosen for analysis is smaller than those that are typical of the electricutility industry. In the model facility analysis, EPA evaluated a 500 megawatt(MW) utility boiler, while the commenters assert that a typical utilityboiler is in the 1000 to 2000 MW size range. These commenters expressedconcern that the larger utility boiler could not comply with the proposednitrogen dioxide increment requirement.In response to this comment, EPA reexamined the selection of the modelutility boiler evaluated in the development of the proposed increments.In examining 40 PSD permit applications for new coal-fired utility plantsin the new source review (NSR) data base, only 2 of 72 individual boilerswere found that were larger than 1000 MW in capacity. The other utilityboilers in the NSR data base ranged from 300 to 800 MW in size, and averagedapproximately 500 MW. The EPA assumption of 500 MW is also consistent withthe typical power plant boiler analyzed by the Electric Power ResearchInstitute, the Department of Energy (DOE), and the Tennessee Valley Authority.The DOE also projected that future utility boilers would typically be approximately500 MW, based on projections submitted by the utility industry. Consequently,EPA believes that the selection of a 500 MW boiler is appropriate for themodel utility boiler analysis.The EPA's model facilities analysis indicates that a utility boiler inthe 1000 MW size range would be able to comply with the increment requirements,except under the most adverse circumstances. Some of the commenters citeda table in the Technical Support Document (Volume I, Table 2) to supporttheir contention that these facilities would violate the increment. Itshould be noted that the figures given in this table are for uncontrolledsources and do not include the effectiveness of emission controls thatcould be used to reduce these emissions. Although a 1000 MW utility boilerwas not examined in the initial analysis, EPA considers it reasonable toexpect that the technology required to meet a 25 andCx.18;g/m3 incrementon a 1000 MW boiler would be similar to that required to meet a 15 andCx.18;g/m3increment for a 500 MW utility boiler which was analyzed by EPA. Basedon this assumption, there are demonstrated or developing control technologies(e.g., overfire air, ``low-NO<T2>x</T2>'' burners, reburning, selective catalytic combustion, selectivenoncatalytic reduction) available for reducing nitrogen oxides emissionsfrom utility boilers to these levels. Using these technologies, the incrementwould be constraining on the operation of a 1000 MW utility boiler onlyif it was located in an urban area and under the most restrictive meteorologicalconditions used in EPA's analyses.Several commenters stated that internal combustion (IC) engines in themodel facility for gas compressor stations are not typical in either sizeor control technology. They claimed that typical natural gas compressorstations have multiple IC engines in the 800-1500 horsepower range, ratherthan the three 4500 horsepower IC engines used in the model plant. Thiserror, they feel, would result in an underestimation of costs of controllingemissions from this type of source. One commenter stated that prestratifiedcharge and nonselective catalytic reduction cannot be used on a 4500 horsepower(hp) gas compressor engine, as indicated in the model plant analysis, andthat both prestratified charge combustion and nonselective catalytic reductioncan only be used on smaller rich-burn engines.In response to these comments, EPA reviewed the size of the IC enginesselected for this model facility, as well as the control devices appliedto each. First, it was found that the 4500 hp IC engines are more typicalof gas compressor stations than the multiple, smaller IC engines mentionedby the commenter. Second, in designing new or modified compressor stations,applicants can comply with the increment through the use of larger IC engines,or by selecting stationary gas turbines which have negligible control costimpacts.In order to examine the impact of the increment on the multiple small engines,the costs of precombustion modification controls were determined for smallerengines (i.e., 1000 hp) of equal aggregate capacity and compared to thecosts for the same controls on the larger engines analyzed in the modelfacility analysis. This analysis shows the costs of control for the 1000hp engines are 2 to 3 times the costs of control for the 4500 hp engines.In order to determine the significance of these increases in costs, theirimpacts on product prices were calculated. At the 25 andCx.18;g/m3 incrementlevel, the maximum projected product price was unchanged for compressorstations located in rural areas and increased to 1.2 percent in urban areas.Although greater than the 0.4 percent increase in product prices for themodel facility reported in the original analysis, these product price impactsare still less than the 5 percent significance level used to classify regulatoryactions as major. Moreover, they do not reflect available mitigating measuresthat could dampen the cost increases and subsequent price effects.    For the 1000 hp engine, the costs of prestratified charge combustion werecompared to the costs of precombustion modification. With prestratifiedcharge control technology, the total annual costs and cost effectivenessare less than the costs for precombustion modification, due the decreasein fuel use associated with prestratified charge. Although this decreasein fuel use may not be present in all instances, it is clear that the costsof prestratified charge controls on a 1000 hp engine will be no greaterthan the cost for precombustion modification.Finally, the EPA reviewed the applicability of prestratified charge combustionand nonselective catalytic reduction to larger rich-burn engines. The EPAagrees with the commenters that prestratified charge combustion is onlyused on small engines. The preamble and Technical Support Document preparedfor the proposal of these regulations erroneously described the technologyanalyzed for larger IC engines (i.e., 4500 hp) as prestratified chargecombustion. In fact, the actual technology analyzed was precombustion modification.Nonselective catalytic reduction, however, is offered by vendors on enginesof up to at least 10,000 hp. Consequently, analysis of this technologyas applied to the model 4500 hp IC engine was appropriate.One commenter stated that surface mining operations were not consideredin EPA's analyses of the potential impacts of the proposed increment. Thiscommenter submitted an air quality analysis of a theoretical surface coalmine to support the contention that application of the Class I and ClassII increments to surface mining presents potential compliance problems.The EPA has reviewed the materials submitted by the commenter. This reviewrevealed that certain assumptions in the commenter's analysis result inan apparent over-estimation of the impacts of surface mining operationson consumption of the nitrogen dioxide increment. The information submittedby the commenter was based largely on emissions from diesel engines andrelied on outdated emission factors. In addition, vehicle miles traveledby the diesel equipment used at the mine were very high when compared withprevious EPA studies of actual surface mining operations.Assuming more reasonable estimates and using currently available emissionfactors, EPA estimates that the nitrogen oxides emissions and the impactson ambient nitrogen dioxide concentrations would be approximately 12 percentof the values reported by the commenter. Although, in some instances, theEPA analysis indicates that the off-site impacts of the mining operationcould exceed the increment, these impacts could be reduced below the incrementlevel through the use of more advanced emission control technology on dieselengines or reconfiguration of sources within the facility to reduce off-siteimpacts (e.g., placing the main haul road farther from the property line).If located very close to a Class I area, such a source does have the potentialto cause increment exceedances. However, the siting of surface mines closeto Class I areas has in the past been constrained more by aesthetic andvisibility issues than by increments such as those for particulate matter,and EPA believes that this will continue to be the case in the future.G. Air Quality ModelingSeveral commenters stated that EPA air quality models predict concentrationshigher than would actually occur. The use of these models in the nitrogendioxide increment determination, they feel, would result in faster apparentconsumption of the increment.The EPA believes the issue of model overprediction should be viewed intwo parts: whether the EPA models overpredict when determining the impactof a nonreactive pollutant, and whether the models overpredict when determiningnitrogen dioxide increment consumption. On the first issue, the EPA doesnot agree that models such as the industrial source complex (ISC) modeloverpredict when determining the impact of a nonreactive pollutant. Infact, the downwash algorithm was recently modified because studies haveshown that the previous algorithm underpredicted concentrations for sourceswith short stacks. As to the second issue, EPA recommends a three-tieredscreening model approach for determining nitrogen dioxide annual averages.The EPA agrees that the first level screening technique (assuming thatall the nitrogen oxides are emitted as nitrogen dioxide) provides a highestimate of nitrogen dioxide ground level concentrations. There is no simple,accurate model for determining the rate of nitric oxide to nitrogen dioxideconversion. After the initial screen, if more accurate modeling resultsare needed, the ozone limiting method can be applied to the annual nitrogendioxide estimate from point sources as a second level screen, or for eachhour of the year as a third level screen. The ozone limiting method isa simple method that attempts to take into account the conversion of nitricoxide to nitrogen dioxide in the atmosphere. Its use will result in a loweringof the modeled maximum ground level concentrations. Therefore, EPA feelsthat the choice between simple overpredictive models and more complex,but more accurate, models available to the source provides a solution inpossible cases of overprediction.One commenter provided an analysis to show the impact of the overpredictivecharacter of the initial, first level screen. That analysis was not credible,however, because of the use of atypical emission parameters that were thenmodeled as though the releases occurred near the edge of the property boundary,thus greatly increasing the impact of these emissions. Also, the facilitywas modeled on the assumption that it operates on a 24-hour basis, therebyincluding a large number of stable and low wind speed conditions that resultin higher ground level concentrations. These conditions are less likelyto occur during the day. Until experience with these screening methodsdemonstrates otherwise, EPA will continue to recommend the three-tieredmodeling approach for obtaining annual average estimates of nitrogen dioxidefrom point sources. On a case-by-case basis, however, EPA will considerother modeling techniques proposed by permit applicants to more accuratelyassess increment consumption.Several commenters stated that EPA does not have sufficient guidance onmodelling long-term concentrations from mobile sources. The commenterssaid that there is a lot of uncertainty associated with modeling nitrogendioxide emissions from mobile sources with the industrial source complexlong-term (ISCLT) model and are concerned that such modeling will substantiallyoverestimate actual concentrations.The ISCLT model is recommended for determining imapcts from mobile sourceemissions when localized areas of high ambient nitrogen dioxide concentrationsare expected, because it is the only long-term guideline model that canbe used for these sources. An assessment of the performance of the ISCLTmodel for these applications is not now available. The ISCLT model will,of course, continue to be evaluated as experience is gained with theseapplications. For most urban area analyses, localized areas of high ambientnitgrogen dioxide concentrations need not be considered, and mobile sourcescan be modeled as area sources using the climatological dispersion model(CDM) as a guideline. For determining nitrogen dioxide increment consumption,these models overestimate impacts because they do not account for nitrogendioxide chemical transformations. When combined with the ozone limitingmethod, however, these models will result in less overestimation of groundlevel nitrogen dioxide concentrations.Several commenters said that existing models are inappropriate for reactivepollutants at extended distances from the source and for long-term periodsmodeling of reactive pollutants is complex and burdensome and, given thereactive nature of nitrogen dioxide, sophisticated photochemical transportand dispersion models are requred for realistic analysis of increment consumption.The commenters conclude that EPA must address the long-range modeling issuesfor reactive pollutants before a standard such as the 2.5 andCx.18;g/m\3\Class I nitrogen dioxide increment can be implemented. The EPA agrees with the commenters that models to account for the long-rangetransport of reactive pollutants, such as nitrogen dioxide, are not fullydeveloped. The chemistry involved in the modeling of several merging andbackground sources emitting nitrogen oxides can become very complex, ascan defining meteorological conditions over the distances and time scalesassociated with long-range transport. Thus, applying a long-range transportmodel can be a highly complex and very expensive undertaking. However,EPA neither recommends nor requires that applicants perform this type ofanalysis for the purpose of complying with air quality standards and increments.Some commenters stated that there is insufficient guidance available forcalculating long-term concentrations for point and area (i.e., mobile)sources in complex terrain, and that meteorological data needed to makethe calculations are not readily available. In response, EPA notes thatthe simple screening techniques described in section 5 of the EPA modelingguideline can be used to determine long-term concentrations for point sourcesin complex terrain. Mobile sources in complex terrain can be modeled usingthe area source algorithm in the CDM or ISCLT models. The use of thesetechniques can be justified because plume rise from areawide mobile sourceemissions is negligible, significant impacts occur close to the source,and plume impaction on elevated terrain is considered insignificant onan annual basis. More complex situations can be modeled on a case-by-casebasis. It is true that meteorological data in areas with complex terrain are generallysparse. Modeling mobile source effects, as recommended by EPA, however,would be done primarily for areas of high traffic, such as urban areas.In such areas, meteorological data should be readily available. For othercases, preconstruction monitoring of meteorological parameters may be required.A number of commenters felt that the Prudhoe Bay study conducted in conjunctionwith this rulemaking did not consider several important modeling issues.The EPA agrees that the Prudhoe Bay area is complex and difficult to model.The Prudhoe Bay model analysis used in this rulemaking, however, was basedon existing modeling results presented by applicants in their permit applications,represents the modeling guidance for which permits were issued, and isconsidered acceptable for the purposes of the rulemaking analysis. No newmodeling was performed. A number of commenters said that the use of the model facility analysisin the technical support document to determine the effect of the incrementdid not consider three important factors: (1) Many facilities which emitnitrogen oxides are located in complex terrain, although the model facilityanalysis considered flat terrain impact only; (2) the potential for widevariability in the modeling results needs to be reviewed before any factualforecasts on impacts can be made; and (3) receptors closer than 200 metersfrom the source were not considered, which is inconsistent with EPA modelingguidance that uses receptors as close as three building heights from astack. The EPA's model facility analysis did not use a complex terrain model todetermine the effect of the increment because it is difficult to definea ``prototypical'' complex terrain example that can be used as a substitutefor the site-specific analysis required for most facilities located incomplex terrain. Because of this, and cost and schedule constraints, theeffect of complex terrain was approximated by doubling the maximum groundlevel concentrations derived from the ISCLT model (see Appendix B of theTechnical Support Document, Vol II). Second, the EPA's model facility analysis considered the variability inmodeling results by using the input of 5 years of meteorological data fromthree National Weather Service (NWS) stations, located in three distinctclimatic zones. Urban and rural dispersion parameters were also used toprovide a range of conditions. Thus, a wide range of model impact conditionswas obtained. The commenter selected the station which showed the highestimpact to determine the potential for growth in the commenter's regions.A more accurate method for assessment of growth would be to use a nearbyNWS station in that region. Finally, the EPA's model facility analysis assumed typical building layouts,stack heights, and emissions, based on the new source review data base.The distance to maximum concentrations varied by source type, year andlocation of meteorological data selected, and urban or rural classification.For the higher emitting utility boiler and gas turbine sources, the distanceto maximum impact was beyond 200 meters. Therefore, 200 meters was chosenas a reasonable close-in receptor distance. H. Costs Commenters stated that EPA did not consider all of the costs involved inimplementing the nitrogen oxides PSD regulations, such as: (1) Retrofitcosts in areas where little increment is available; (2) costs of nitrogenoxides control for mobile sources; (3) the costs of controlling hazardouswastes or toxic emissions generated by nitrogen oxides control technologies;and (4) annualized cost impacts as current electric generation reservecapacities are used up and power plant construction programs increase.The costs of retrofitting nitrogen oxides emission control technologiesto existing sources were not considered by EPA in the development of theincrement because such controls are not expected to be required becauseof the increment program. Rather, the program is structured to preventincrement violations in the first place. In theory, existing sources couldbe called upon to retrofit controls if an increment violation is discovered.In that case, the PSD regulations require that the State develop a planto correct the violation. The decision on which sources would have to becontrolled rests with the State. The possibility of an increment violationwould have been much greater if a 1980 baseline date has been established.In any case, all new PSD sources will know before construction begins whethercontrol technologies are needed to aviod increment violations. In addition,the costs of retrofitting controls to modified sources may be higher thanfor applying controls to new sources, but are not expected to be substantiallyhigher than the costs of controls required by current BACT requirementsfor new sources. Mobile source emission control costs were not included in this analysisbecause mobile sources are not subject to permitting under new source review.The costs of mobile source emission controls are accounted for in the developmentof regulatory requirements directly applicable to motor vehicles.The costs of controlling hazardous wastes generated by nitrogen oxide emissioncontrol technologies were included in the analysis of the model facilities.These costs included the costs of recycling or disposing of spent catalysts.The estimates of the cost impact of this increment on the electric utilityindustry are based on assumptions which may overstate the plant incrementalcontrol costs as well as the number of plants subject to control. Theseassumptions result in high estimated cost impacts for a number of reasons.First, the cost impacts of the increment requirements were estimated asthe increase in control costs over the BACT base-case requirements. TheBACT levels chosen for the base case, however, were not based on thoseimplemented by the States with the most stringent BACT determinations.Consequently, the analyzed cost differences between BACT and the incrementprogram are potentially overstated. Further, the estimates of growth in the electric utility industry werebased on the growth rate for all PSD sources during the last few years.Eleven percent of the PSD permits in recent years have been for electricutility generating stations. Consequently, of the 250 PSD permits per yearexpected, based on past experience, for the period 1990-1994, 28 permitsper year were assumed to be for utility electric generating stations. Basedon historical plant distributions, these PSD permits would be expectedto include 15 coal-fired boilers. This corresponds to a combined new capacityof 7500 MW per year, assuming a typical boiler size of 500 MW. Therefore,for the 5-year period 1990-1994, a total of 75 coal-fired utilities with37,500 MW of new capacity were projected by the EPA study. In contrast,the electric utility industry has projected an increase in coal-fired plantcapacity of only 8600 MW during this 5-year period (see U.S. Departmentof Energy Information Administration, Inventory of Power Plants, 1986).Thus, EPA's analysis has likely overestimated the number of coal-firedsteam electric utility facilities expected to be constructed during thetime period studied, as well as the total capacity of these facilities.One commenter used cost impact arguments to advocate nitrogen dioxide incrementsthat are no less than 45 percent of the NAAQS. The cost impacts of theproposed increments are alleged to: (1) Possibly preclude full developmentat a reasonable cost for lignite-based electricity generation; (2) resultin pass-through of control costs from electricity purchased to consumersof products which use lignite-based electricity as a production input;and (3) affect the ability of firms to compete in foreign markets and,hence, affect the United States' balance of trade. Promulgation of the proposed PSD increments will not preclude full developmentof lignite-based electricity generation. Moreover, the added costs of thepromulgated increments should reflect the fact that the use of the airresource is not free and should be included in the costs of providing electricity.One commenter believed the focus of the economic impact analyses shouldbe the competitiveness of the industries affected by the regulation, notprice impacts. The commenter also believed a regulatory impact analysis(RIA) may be in order as a result of a comparative analysis showing selectivecatalytic reduction to have 60 percent greater capital costs than notedin the proposal preamble. Regarding the focus of the economic impact analysis, most such analysesbegin with the potential cost increase. The decision to extend these estimatesto examine the distributive consequences of a regulation is a functionof the size of the potential cost increase and the requirements for moreextensive analysis. The EPA economic impact analysis showed the potentialcost increase, both as a percent of product prices and as an absolute annualizedcost estimate, to be relatively small and to not warrant an RIA. Thus,the economic impact analysis was not extended to examine distributive effectslike competitiveness. With respect to the need for an RIA, the commenter's comparative cost analysisfocuses on retrofit situations with selective catalytic reduction as thecontrol technique. As noted in the response to previous commenters, theretrofit focus is not appropriate. Furthermore, techniques less costlythan selective catalytic reduction are often available. Consequently, EPAmaintains that an RIA is not required. Some commenters stated that a price increase of less than 5 percent couldbe significant to the affected industry. The EPA agrees that potentialproduction cost increases may be important. The ones associated with thisregulation, however, are not significant. Both the absolute and the relativesizes of the estimated production cost increases are such that the regulatoryaction is not classified as major. In particular, for all affected industriesestimated, the worst-case fifth year annualized cost increases total lessthan $64 million in the aggregate. This estimate is on the high side becauseit does not account for available, less costly control options. Several commenters, albeit none of them representing State agencies, statedthat the cost to the States of administering the program has been underestimated.The costs to State agencies of administering the nitrogen dioxide incrementprogram ($135,000 per year) were calculated by EPA as the incremental costof examining each applicant's compliance with the nitrogen dioxide incrementregulation. Since most sources subject to the PSD regulations for nitrogenoxides are also expected to be subject to the increment requirements forparticulate matter and/or sulfur dioxide, the incremental administrationcosts of implementing the nitrogen dioxide increment requirements shouldbe relatively minor. Using the $135,000 per year cost estimate to calculateaverage costs per State (about $3,000 per year) is misleading because manyStates receive no PSD applications for years at a time and would thereforeincur no administrative costs for that period.One commenter's estimate of administrative costs of $10,000,000 per yearcannot be effectively evaluated, since the commenter provided no informationon the derivation of this figure. However, this estimate is not consistentwith EPA's estimate of the costs of administering this increment program.One commenter said the estimated total national costs to applicants of$400,000 per year is too low for all the time, paperwork, and delays associatedwith compliance with this regulation. In response to this comment, EPAhas reexamined the administrative burden of the increment requirements.In the development of these costs, EPA assumed that 16 hours would be requiredfor the nitrogen dioxide increment consumption analysis associated witheach PSD permit application. On reexamination, EPA agrees with the commenterthat this is an underestimate based on the inclusion of mobile sourcesin the analysis. A more accurate estimate of the time typically requiredfor this process was determined to be 60 hours for each application forwhich a mobile source emissions analysis was needed. The actual hours maybe more or less than this estimate, depending on the complexity of thesources and the nature of the area in which the source is located. Basedon this revised estimate, it was projected that the total national administrativecosts of this regulation to permit applicants will be approximately $855,000per year, rather than the initial estimate of $400,000 per year. I. Restrictions on SitingSeveral commenter stated that the increment would prevent utility boilersfrom being constructed near urban areas where they would take advantageof available water supplies and wastewater treatment capacity. The EPAanalysis indicated that, for utility power plants located in urban areas,there are control technologies available that will enable these sourcesto comply with the increment requirements in Class II areas under mostanticipated meteorological conditions. It is possible, however, that adversemeteorological patterns or terrain associated with specific sites couldmake it difficult for a source to comply with the nitrogen dioxide increment,whether that source is a utility boiler or any other nitrogen oxides emissionssource (utility boilers would be more likely, however, to have this problemwith the short-term sulfur dioxide increments, which have been in effectsince 1975, than with the annual nitrogen dioxide increments). This isa possible outcome of any increment system established and is part of thePSD approach to air qualify management. In such a case, the source ownerwould have to review and consider other options available for the sitingand design of the source. One commenter took exception to the EPA claim that the increment will notpose severe constraints on the siting of chemical plants because largenew chemical plants are not expected to locate near urban areas. He pointedto the location of many chemical plants at shipping centers near urbanareas as contradicting this statement.The EPA found that the Class II increment of 25 ug/m\3\ could impose constraintson the location of large chemical plants in urban areas, but only underadverse meteorological conditions, and only if the chemical plants includesignificant emissions from kilns, such as those considered in the modelfacility analysis. Large chemical facilities seeking to locate in urbanareas having more moderate meteorological conditions, or having a differentconfiguration of driers, kilns, process heaters, and other nitrogen oxidesemissions sources, would be expected to be less constrained by the ClassII increment.   It is more likely that chemical manufacturing companies would seek to expandor modify existing facilities in urban areas. In such an instance, thedecisions on the siting and design of the modified facility made by theowner or operator of the source could be affected by the increment requirements.As discussed above, this is a possible outcome inherent in the design ofthe PSD program. It is EPA's conclusion, however, that only in those caseswhere previous increment consumption has been significant will the incrementseverely constrain the siting of modification of an industrial facilitywhen compared to other factors, such as the availability of transportation,financing, raw materials, and labor.   One commenter stated that the proposed increments may severely constraineconomic growth in rural areas, irrespective of the actual threat to airquality in those areas. The commenter stated that rural Class II areasshould be managed differently from urban Class II areas so that the dispersalof growth is encouraged.   In establishing the PSD program, Congress did not distinguish between urbanand rural Class II areas, either in terms of the increments for particulatematter and sulfur dioxide or any other aspects of air quality management.The EPA used similar logic when setting the same nitrogen dioxide incrementsfor rural and urban Class II areas. The EPA analyses show that one possibleeffect of the increment will be the dispersal of industrial growth. Becauseindustrial growth will generally be more rapid in or near urban areas,it is anticipated that any constraints on the siting of industrial facilitiesresulting from the imposition of an increment would be realized in urbanareas first. As a consequence, the increments will create an incentivefor the location of industrial facilities outside of urban areas and intorural areas where the increment has not been consumed. This is currentlythe case for sulfur dioxide and particulate matter. For nitrogen dioxide,emissions reductions from mobile sources are expected to delay this effect.The increments are not, of course, the sole factor shaping decisions aboutthe siting and design of industrial facilities. The EPA expects the nitrogendioxide increments to accommodate siting of new or modified sources inClass II areas in almost all cases.J. Ozone   A number of commenters stated that EPA should analyze more thoroughly therelationship between nitrogen dioxide and ozone, the impact of the nitrogendioxide increments on ozone formation, the potential for acid rain formation,and other environmental issues (e.g., visibility degradation, vegetationdamage).   Recognizing that there can be an inverse relationship between ambient nitrogendioxide levels and ozone levels, a number of commenters said nitrogen dioxideincrements should not be applied in ozone nonattainment areas in orderto avoid worsening the ozone problems in those areas. One commenter saida nitrogen dioxide increment should be required in an area only if it canbe shown that a decrease in ambient nitrogen dioxide will lead to a decreasein ozone levels. Another commenter noted that because of its role in theformation of ozone, nitrogen oxides emissions from new sources are alreadybeing reduced to the maximum extent in his area.   The EPA believes it is important to understand that the nitrogen dioxideincrements will not reduce current nitrogen dioxide concentrations, butinstead place a limit on increases in ambient nitrogen dioxide concentrations.Since it is possible that limiting increases in ambient nitrogen dioxidecan also limit reductions in ozone concentrations, EPA conducted an analysesto determine the potential for all of the Class II nitrogen dioxide incrementto be consumed in selected urban areas with ozone violations. The objectiveof the analysis was to assess whether a less stringent increment wouldbe needed to allow (in certain areas) for ozone reduction by increasingnitrogen dioxide availability in the atmosphere. This analysis indicatedthat all of the proposed Class II nitrogen dioxide increment of 25 andCx.18;g/m\3\(annual average) would not be consumed in the urban areas studied, evenwhen emissions growth was projected to the year 2010 using the growth assumptionsbelieved to be most realistic. Consequently, it is not necessary to givefurther consideration to a less stringent increment on this basis. Theanalysis has been included in this rulemaking docket.K. Baseline Date   Comments were solicited on the proposed baseline date of February 8, 1988,and on two alternatives. One of these alternatives was a 1980 baselinedate, the date Congress expected the PSD regulations for nitrogen oxidesto become effective. Some commenters claimed that a baseline date of 1980is necessary in order to address the deterioration in air quality thathas taken place due to increases in nitrogen oxides emissions since 1980.One commenter pointed out that, although selection of a 1980 baseline datemay result in some areas currently being in violation of the increment,these problems can be addressed through the use of the Class II designation.  A 1980 baseline date could affect Class I and some Class II areas differently.As discussed earlier in this notice, the first complete PSD permit applicationfor a major new source or a major modification received after the triggerdate establishes the minor source baseline date and the baseline concentration.Once the baseline concentration is set, minor (including mobile) sourcescan consume or expand increment. As discussed in the proposed rulemakingat 53 FR 3706, for urban Class II areas in which major source permits havebeen received since 1980, selection of a 1980 baseline date could resultin the setting of a higher baseline concentration and, consequently, ahigher nitrogen dioxide concentration limit (baseline plus increment) thatwould be the case for a 1988 baseline date. The EPA urban analysis indicatesthat, for many urban areas, the decrease in mobile source nitrogen oxidesemissions since 1980 has exceeded increases in stationary source nitrogenoxides for the same period. Thus, mobile source emissions reductions eitherexpand the available increment, if the minor source baseline date (andhence the baseline concentration) has been set, or reduce the baselinenitrogen dioxide concentration if it has not. For most rural areas, themajor source baseline date and trigger date selections should have littleimpact. In Class I areas, a studies of the impact of a 1980 baseline indicatethat the maximum degradation in Class I areas since 1980 has been lessthan 1 andCx.18;g/m\3\.The EPA agrees that redesignation from Class II to Class III is a possibilityfor those areas which find themselves in violation of the Class II incrementbecause of a retroactive regulation. However, redesignation to Class IIIwas intended as an avenue for those areas which wish to make the consciousdecision to allow more future growth than would be permitted under a ClassII increment_not as a remedy where a Class II increment has been (albeitunintentionally) exceeded by the setting of a baseline with a retroactive1980 date.On the other hand, several commenters supported the proposed 1988 baselinedate, repeating many of the arguments in the preamble to the proposed regulations(53 FR 3705). For example, several commenters pointed out the practicalproblems with the use of a 1980 baseline date, which would require thereconstruction of data on the ambient concentration of nitrogen dioxideand emissions of nitrogen oxides in a PSD area as of 1980. They statedthat this information may no longer be available, or be difficult to obtainand analyze. Further, the consumption of increment since 1980 would alsohave to be based on available records of permits and emissions, which maynot be complete. The EPA agrees with these commenters that a 1980 baselinedate could present severe technical and administrative difficulties. Inaddition, although it is unlikely, the available historical records mayshow that some areas would alaready be in violation of the increment atthe time of promulgation as the result of emissions growth since 1980.Such violations may require retrofit emissions control technologies tobe applied to existing sources in order to bring the area into compliancewith the increment. Requiring sources to retrofit emission control devicesraises several concerns. First of all, it obviously would be very unfair.The EPA has had BACT requirements for No<T2>x </T2>emitters since before 1980. Sources based emission control systemdecisions on these regulations. A retrofit requirement could essentiallyundercut the emission control efforts already undertaken. In addition,this retrofitting goes against the grain of the general thrust of the congressionalPSD program, namely, that it apply, insofar as new major sources and majormodifications are concerned, prospectively and not retrospectively. Several commenters stated that the baseline date should be the promulgationdate or the effective date of the regulation. The rationale, for this recommendationwas that the later baseline date would allow States and permit applicantsmore time to make an orderly transition into the increment program thanwould the February 1988 baseline.The EPA does not believe that the February 1988 baseline date poses significantadministrative difficulties for State agencies in implementing the inventoryand increment requirements of the regulation. States have been aware ofthe nitrogen dioxide increments since the date of proposal. Although manycommenters from industry suggested that this process would be time consuming,it is important to note that comments from the State agencies themselveshave not questioned their ability to implement and administer an incrementprogram for nitrogen dioxide based on a February 8, 1988 baseline date.Setting the baseline date at the date of proposal will prevent the ownersor operators of prospective new sources from attempting to avoid the incrementrequirements by submitting permit applications early. This situation usuallyoccurs when a prospective baseline date is selected. Not only would suchaction result in some sources not being covered by the program, but dealingwith this influx of new source applications would hinder the State agenciesin their effort to implement this program and construct emissions inventories.The EPA believes that the February 8, 1988 baseline represents the bestaccommodation of the pros and cons provided by the various choices. TheEPA has concluded that this baseline is practical, both technically andadministratively. A propective baseline date would encourage early applicationand may provide inadequate environmental protection. Conversely, a retroactivebaseline date would be very difficult to implement and would provide noclear environmental benefit because, as explained above, it would expandthe available increment in some areas and contract it in others. In addition,it would present the possibility of requiring retrofitting of pollutioncontrol equipment, which, in keeping with congressional intent, the PSDprogram has historically sought to avoid.L. Emissions BankingA few commenters expressed their concern about the apparent eliminationof the emissions banking system, because the establishment of a nitrogendioxide increment would exclude previously banked nitrogen oxides emissionscredits created by industries for their future expansion. To some extent,this concern is valid. Today's action does limit the use of banked nitrogenoxides emission reduction credits (ERC's) for netting to those ERC's whichwould affect the nitrogen dioxide increment. This restriction is alreadyincluded in the definition of ``net emissions increases'' in determiningwhether emissions of sulfur dioxide and particulate matter are creditable.The EPA believes that it is appropriate to apply similar restrictions tonitrogen oxides netting transactions to comply with the actual emissionsconcept in section 169, paragraph (4), of the Act, as described above.Furthermore, EPA wishes to continue its policy of treating all ERC's thesame within the new source review (including PSD) program. This means thatbanked ERC's receive no special consideration in netting transactions overany other ERC's. Banked ERC's must meet all the same requirements as ERC'sthat are not banked. M. AdministrationTwo commenters stated that the proposed nitrogen dioxide increment wouldplace a large burden on the State agencies charged with the responsibilityfor administering the program. One claim that, for that local agency, theestablishment of a nitrogen dioxide increment would result in a large increasein work load without a signficant benefit in local air quality, becauseof the stringency of their existing BACT program. That agency also predictedthat detailed increment consumption analysis will become a routine requirementbecause projects with nitrogen oxides emissions greater than 40 tons/yearwill probably exceed the significant impact level. The other commenterstated that the nitrogen oxides regulations will be even more difficultto administer and manage than sulfur dioxide or particulate matter increments,which, this commenter claimed, States have been unsuccessful in implementingto date. The EPA agrees that the increment program for nitrogen dioxide will resultin an increase in the States' work loads, since a new pollutant is beingadded to the increment consumption analysis. The added work load shouldbe relatively small, however, because the nitrogen dioxide increment consumptionanalysis can be based on existing administrative structures. The only changeto the modeling review procedures will be the need for separate reviewsof the baseline concentration and increment consumption data, and verificationthat the increment has not been exceeded. The ability of State and localagencies to administer this program is evidenced by the fact that onlyone of the State and local agencies commenting on this regulation expressedconcern that they would not be able to administer this program. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Administrative</ITAG>DocketThe docket is an organized and complete file of all the information consideredby EPA in the development of this rulemaking. The docket is intended toallow the public to identify and locate documents so they can effectivelyparticipate in the rulemaking process. Along with the statement of basisand purpose of the proposed and promulgated regulations and EPA responsesto significant comments, the contents of the docket, except for intraagencyreview materials, will serve as the record in case of judicial review (seesection 307(d)(7)(A) of the Act).Under section 307(b)(1) of the Act, judicial review of the actions takenby this notice is available only by the filing of a petition for reviewin the U.S. Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit within60 days of today's publication of this rule. Under section 307(b)(2) ofthe Act, the requirements that are the subject of today's notice may notbe challenged later in civil or criminal proceedings brought by EPA toenforce these requirements.Paperwork Reduction ActThe information collection requirements contained in this rule have beenapproved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under the provisionsof the Paperwork Reduction Act, 44 U.S.C. 2501 <T3>et seq. </T3>and have been assigned OMB Control Number 2060-0003. Thepublic reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto vary from 1 to 1000 hours per response, with an average of 60 hoursper response, including time for reviewing instructions, searching existingdata sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completingand reviewing the collection of information. Reporting time per respondentwill increase slightly as a result of this action. The increase per respondent,however, is insignificant on the average.Send comments regarding the burden estimate or any other aspect of thiscollection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burden,to Chief, Information Policy Branch, PM-223, U.S. Environmental ProtectionAgency, 401 M Street, SW., Washington, DC 20460; and to the Office of Informationand Regulatory Affairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC20503, marked ``Attention: Desk Officer for EPA.''Economic Impact AssessmentSection 317 of the Act requires the Administrator to prepare an economicimpact assessment for any regulations under Part C of Title I (relatingto PSD of air quality). An economic impact assessment was prepared forthe PSD increments for nitrogen dioxide promulgated today. The economicimpact assessment is included in Docket A-87-16.Regulatory Flexibility ActPursuant to the provisions of 5 U.S.C. 605(b), I hereby certify that thisrule will not have significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small business entities (see 46 FR 8709).<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>40 CFR Part 51Air pollution control, Intergovernmental relations, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Nitrogen dioxide, State implementation plans.40 CFR Part 52Air pollution control, Nitrogen dioxide.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: October 7, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG>For the reasons set out in the preamble, Parts 51 and 52 of Chapter 1 ofTitle 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations are amended as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 51_REQUIREMENTS FOR PREPARATION, ADOPTION, AND SUBMITTAL OF IMPLEMENTATIONPLANS</ITAG>1. The authority for Part 51 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 101(b)(1), 110, 160-169, 171-178, and 301(a)of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401(b)(1), 7410, 7470-7479, 7501-7508,and 7601(a).</ITAG>2. In andSection; 51.166, paragraphs (b)(3)(iv), (b)(13)(i), (b)(13)(ii)(<T3>a</T3>), (b)(13)(ii)(<T3>b</T3>) and (b)(14)(i) are revised; paragraph (b)(14)(ii) is redesignatedas paragraph (b)(14)(iii) and a new paragraph (b)(14)(ii) is added; paragraphs(b)(15)(i), (b)(15)(ii)(<T3>a</T3>), (f)(1)(v), (f)(4)(i), the last sentence of paragraphs (p)(4)and the tables in paragraphs (c) and (p)(4) are revised; and paragraph(i)(11) and the OMB control number are added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 51.166</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prevention of significant deterioration of air quality.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(3) * * *(iv) An increase or decrease in actual emissions of sulfur dioxide, particulatematter, or nitrogen oxides which occurs before the applicable minor sourcebaseline date is creditable only if it is required to be considered incalculating the amount of maximum allowable increases remaining available.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(13)(i) ``Baseline concentration'' means that ambient concentration levelwhich exists in the baseline area at the time of the applicable minor sourcebaseline date. A baseline concentration is determined for each pollutantfor which a minor source baseline date is established and shall include:(<T3>a</T3>) The actual emissions representative of sources in existenceon the applicable minor source baseline date, except as provided in paragraph(b)(13)(ii) of this section;(<T3>b</T3>) The allowable emissions of major stationary sources which commencedconstruction before the major source baseline date, but were not in operationby the applicable minor source baseline date.(ii) * * *(<T3>a</T3>) Actual emissions from any major stationary source on whichconstruction commenced after the major source baseline date; and(<T3>b</T3>) Actual emissions increases and decreases at any stationarysource occurring after the minor source baseline date.(14)(i) ``Major source baseline date'' means:(<T3>a</T3>) In the case of particulate matter and sulfur dioxide, January6, 1975, and(<T3>b</T3>) In the case of nitrogen dioxide, February 8, 1988.(ii) ``Minor source baseline date'' means the earliest date after the triggerdate on which a major stationary source or a major modification subjectto 40 CFR 52.21 or to regulations approved pursuant to 40 CFR 51.166 submitsa complete application under the relevant regulations. The trigger dateis:(<T3>a</T3>) In the case of particulate matter and sulfur dioxide, August7, 1977, and(<T3>b</T3>) In the case of nitrogen dioxide, February 8, 1988.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(15)(i) ``Baseline area'' means any intrastate area (and every part thereof)designated as attainment or unclassifiable under section 107(d)(1)(D) or(E) of the Act in which the major source or major modification establishingthe minor source baseline date would construct or would have an air qualityimpact equal to or greater than 1 andCx.18;g/m\3\ (annual average) of thepollutant for which the minor source baseline date is established.(ii) * * *(<T3>a</T3>) Establishes a minor source baseline date; or<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s20,9.1</C> <H1>Pollutant</H1><H1>Maximum allowable increase (micrograms per cubic meter)</H1><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Class I</T4><R/></ITAG>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>5</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>10</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>5</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>25</D>Nitrogen dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>2.5</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Class II</T4><R/></ITAG>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>19</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>37</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>20</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>91</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>512</D>Nitrogen dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>25</D><R/><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Class III</T4><R/></ITAG>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>37</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>75</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>40</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>182</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>700</D>Nitrogen dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) * * *(1) * * *(v) Concentrations attributable to the temporary increase in emissionsof sulfur dioxide, particulate matter, or nitrogen oxides from stationarysources which are affected by plan revisions approved by the Administratoras meeting the criteria specified in paragraph (f)(4) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) * * *(i) Specifies the time over which the temporary emissions increase of sulfurdioxide, particulate matter, or nitrogen oxides would occur. Such timeis not to exceed 2 years in duration unless a longer time is approved bythe Administrator.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(i) * * *(11) The plan may provide that the permitting requirements equivalent tothose contained in paragraph (k)(2) of this section do not apply to a stationarysource or modification with respect to any maximum allowable increase fornitrogen oxides if the owner or operator of the source or modificationsubmitted an application for a permit under the applicable permit programapproved or promulgated under the Act before the provisions embodying themaximum allowable increase took effect as part of the plan and the permittingauthority subsequently determined that the application as submitted beforethat date was complete.(p) * * *(4) * * * If the Federal land manager concurs with such demonstration andso certifies to the State, the reviewing authority may: <T3>Provided,</T3> That applicable requirements are otherwise met, issuethe permit with such emission limitations as may be necessary to assurethat emissions of sulfur dioxide, particulate matter, and nitrogen oxideswould not exceed the following maximum allowable increases over minor sourcebaseline concentration for such pollutants:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Pollutant </H1><H1>Maximum allowable increase (micrograms per cubic meter)</H1>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>19</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>37</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>20</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>91</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>325</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrogen dioxide: Annual arithmetic mean<D>25</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by Office of Management and Budget under the control number2060-0003)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 52_APPROVAL AND PROMULGATION OF IMPLEMENTATION PLANS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 52 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4> 42 U.S.C. 7401-7642.</ITAG>2. In andSection; 52.21, paragraphs (b)(3)(iv), (b)(13)(i), (b)(13)(ii)(<T3>a</T3>), (b)(13)(ii)(<T3>b</T3>) and (b)(14)(<T3>i</T3>) are revised; paragraph (b)(14)(ii) is redesignated as paragraph(b)(14)(iii) and a new paragraph (b)(14)(ii) is added; paragraphs (b)(15)(i),(b)(15)(ii)(<T3>a</T3>), (f)(1)(v), (f)(4)(i), the last sentence of paragraph (p)(5)and the tables in paragraphs (c) and (p)(5) are revised and paragraph (i)(12)and the OMB control number are added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prevention of significant deterioration of air quality.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(3) * * *(iv) An increase or decrease in actual emissions of sulfur dioxide, particulatematter, or nitrogen oxides which occurs before the applicable minor sourcebaseline date is creditable only if it is required to be considered incalculating the amount of maximum allowable increases remaining available.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(13)(i) ``Baseline concentration'' means that ambient concentration levelwhich exists in the baseline area at the time of the applicable minor sourcebaseline date. A baseline concentration is determined for each pollutantfor which a baseline date is established and shall include:(<T3>a</T3>) The actual emissions representative of sources in existenceon the applicable minor source baseline date, except as provided in paragraph(b)(13)(ii) of this section;(<T3>b</T3>) The allowable emissions of major stationary sources which commencedconstruction before the major source baseline date but were not in operationby the applicable minor source baseline date.(ii) * * *(<T3>a</T3>) Actual emissions from any major stationary source on whichconstruction commenced after the major source baseline date; and(<T3>b</T3>) Actual emissions increases and decreases at any stationarysource occurring after the minor source baseline date.(14)(i) ``Major source baseline date'' means:(<T3>a</T3>) In the case of particulate matter and sulfur dioxide, January6, 1975, and(<T3>b</T3>) In the case of nitrogen dioxide, February 8, 1988.(ii) ``Minor source baseline date'' means the earliest date after the triggerdate on which a major stationary source or a major modification subjectto 40 CFR 52.21 or to regulations approved pursuant to 40 CFR 51.166 submitsa complete application under the relevant regulations. The trigger dateis:(<T3>a</T3>) In the case of particulate matter and sulfur dioxide, August7, 1977, and(<T3>b</T3>) In the case of nitrogen dioxide, February 8, 1988.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(15)(i) ``Baseline area'' means any intrastate area (and every part thereof)designated as attainment or unclassifiable under section 107(d)(1) (D)or (E) of the Act in which the major source or major modification establishingthe minor source baseline date would construct or would have an air qualityimpact equal to or greater than 1 ug/m\3\ (annual average) of the pollutantfor which the minor source baseline date is established.(ii) * * *(<T3>a</T3>) Establishes a minor source baseline date; or<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s25,7.1</C> <H1> Pollutant</H1><H1>Maximum allowable increase (micrograms per cubic meter)</H1><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Class I</T4><R/></ITAG>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>5</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>10</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>2</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>5</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>25</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrogen dioxide: Annual arithmetic mean<D>2.5</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Class II </T4><R/></ITAG>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>19</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>37</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>20</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>91</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>512</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrogen dioxide: Annual arithmetic mean<D>25</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Class III </T4><R/></ITAG>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>37</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>75</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>40</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>182</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>700</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrogen dioxide: Annual arithmetic mean<D>50</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) * * *(1) * * *(v) Concentrations attributable to the temporary increase in emissionsof sulfur dioxide, particulate matter, or nitrogen oxides from stationarysources which are affected by plan revisions approved by the Administratoras meeting the criteria specified in paragraph (f)(4) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) * * *(i) Specify the time over which the temporary emissions increase of sulfurdioxide, particulate matter, or nitrogen oxides would occur. Such timeis not to exceed 2 years in duration unless a longer time is approved bythe Administrator;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(i) * * *(12) The requirements of paragraph (k)(2) of this section shall not applyto a stationary source or modification with respect to any maximum allowableincrease for nitrogen oxides if the owner or operator of the source ormodification submitted an application for a permit under this section beforethe provisions embodying the maximum allowable increase took effect aspart of the applicable implementation plan and the Administrator subsequentlydetermined that the application as submitted before that date was complete.(p) * * *(5) * * * If the Federal land manager concurs with such demonstration andhe so certifies, the State may authorize the Administrator: <T3>Provided, </T3>That the applicable requirements of this section areotherwise met, to issue the permit with such emission limitations as maybe necessary to assure that emissions of sulfur dioxide, particulate matter,and nitrogen oxides would not exceed the following maximum allowable increasesover minor source baseline concentration for such pollutants:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,s25,8</C> <H1> Pollutant</H1><H1>Maximum allowable increase (micrograms per cubic meter)</H1>Particulate matter:<ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, annual geometric mean</ITAG><D>19</D><ITAG tagnum="3">TSP, 24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>37</D>Sulfur dioxide:<ITAG tagnum="3">Annual arithmetic mean</ITAG><D>20</D><ITAG tagnum="3">24-hr maximum</ITAG><D>91</D><ITAG tagnum="3">3-hr maximum</ITAG><D>325</D><ITAG tagnum="1">Nitrogen dioxide: Annual arithmetic mean<D>25</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by Office of Management and Budget under the control number2060-0003.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-23832 Filed 10-14-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>